Maryland, session 2025, HB1382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
[18–601.1.
(a) An individual who has the human immunodeficiency virus may not knowingly
transfer or attempt to transfer the human immunodeficiency virus to another individual.
(b) A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor
and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $2,500 or imprisonment not exceeding
3 years or both.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Health shall:
(1) review statutory and regulatory policies in the State regarding the
human immunodeficiency virus and determine whether the policies are outdated or
discriminatory; and
(2) make recommendations on updates to policies identified as outdated or
discriminatory under item (1) of this subsection that would align the policies with current
public health best practices.
(b) On or before December 1, 2025, the Department shall report its findings and
recommendations from the review conducted under subsection (a) of this section to the

HOUSE BILL 1382 3
Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and Government Operations Committee,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 2 of this Act is contingent on the Maryland Department of Health’s
ability to conduct the review and make the recommendations required under Section 2 of
this Act with existing Maryland Department of Health resources.
(b) On or before July 5, 2025, the Maryland Department of Health shall notify the
Department of Legislatives Services whether the Maryland Department of Health is able
to conduct the review and make the recommendations with existing resources.
(c) (1) If, on or before July 5, 2025, the Department of Legislative Services
receives a notice that the Maryland Department of Health is able to conduct the review and
make the recommendations with existing resources, Section 2 of this Act shall take effect
on the date the notice is received by the Department of Legislative Services in accordance
with subsection (b) of this section.
(2) If the Department of Legislatives does not receive a notice under
subsection (b) of this section before the end of July 5, 2025, or receives a notice on or before
July 5, 2025, that the Maryland Department of Health does not have sufficient resources
to conduct the review and make the recommendations, Section 2 of this Act, with no further
action required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect October 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 3 of this
Act and except as provided in Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.